Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2077
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Derivative proceedings; applicability to foreign corporations.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, the matters covered by sections 21-2070 to 21-2077 shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of incorporation of the foreign corporation except for sections 21-2073, 21-2075, and 21-2076.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 77.